Wyoming, session 2026, SF0028.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 22-10-108, 22-10-110, 22-11-103(c)
and 22-11-104(b)(iii) are amended to read:
22-10-108. Procedure for preparing machines for
election; inspection and certification.
(a) Before preparing a voting machine for an
election, the county clerk shall, not later than two (2)
days before a test of a voting machine or not later than
twenty-four (24) hours before any re-test of a voting
machine, post a public notice in the office of the county
clerk and on the website of the county clerk and notify in
writing the county chairman of each political party having
a candidate on the ballot and all independent candidates,
stating the time and place where the voting machine will be
prepared for the election. The political party
representatives, and representatives of independent
candidates, at the county clerk's discretion not less than
three (3) members of the public, but not more than a number
that will ensure the orderly testing of machines, and
members of the public may be present at the preparation of
the voting machine for the election, to see that the
machine is tested for accuracy and is properly prepared and
that all registering counters are set at zero (00000). The
county clerk, in the presence of these representatives
attendees, shall prepare the voting machine for the
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0028
ENROLLED ACT NO. 66, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
election and set all registering counters at zero (00000).
He shall then test each registering counter for accuracy by
casting votes on it until the registering counter is
correctly registering each vote cast on it. The county
clerk shall then reset each registering counter to zero
(00000) and shall immediately lock and seal the voting
machine with a numbered metal seal and make a record of the
number of the seal on the certificate for the machine. The
seal shall be so placed as to prevent operation of the
machine or its registering counters without breaking the
seal. The county clerk shall then immediately make a record
on the certificate for the machine of the reading shown on
the protective counter.
(b) Inspection of voting machines may shall begin not
less than two (2) weeks before an election and continue
until all machines to be used are publicly tested and
sealed. Immediately following testing of a machine, the
county clerk shall make a certificate in writing stating
the serial number of each machine, whether the machine has
all the registering counters set at zero (00000), and
whether the machine has been tested by voting on each
registering counter to prove that each registering counter
is in perfect and accurate condition, the number registered
on the protective counter, and the number on the seal with
which the machine is sealed against operation. A copy of
this certificate shall be filed with the secretary of state
and the certificate shall be kept on file in the office of
the county clerk.
(c) No voting machine shall be used in any election
unless the individual machine is tested and prepared in
accordance with this section. Every voting machine used in
an election, including but not limited to all electronic
ballot marking devices, shall be individually tested.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0028
ENROLLED ACT NO. 66, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
22-10-110. Objections.
A voting machine prepared for an election and certified by
the county clerk shall be conclusively presumed to be
properly prepared unless within two (2) days may be
challenged within five (5) days after the machine is sealed
by filing a complaint in the district court, and certified
before the election if a complaint is filed in the district
court of the county stating the number of the machine and
the grounds for objecting to its use.
22-11-103. Capabilities required.
(c) The secretary of state may from time to time as
necessary promulgate rules and regulations consistent with
subsection (a) of this section and with all other
requirements of this Election Code to govern the
characteristics of electronic voting systems that may be
used in Wyoming. The rules shall ensure the fairness and
accuracy of elections. The rules may govern both the
characteristics of the systems and the procedures to be
followed in testing and using the systems. The rules shall
allow the county clerks to follow appropriate
recommendations of the vendors of the systems for
maintenance and management of the systems to the extent
these recommendations are not inconsistent with this
Election Code and with the rules. The rules shall be
adopted following consultation with the county clerks.
22-11-104. Conduct of elections in which systems
utilized.
(b) The county clerk of each county using an
electronic voting system shall:
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0028
ENROLLED ACT NO. 66, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) Before testing an electronic voting system
for an election, not later than two (2) days before a test
of an electronic voting system or not later than
twenty-four (24) hours before any re-test of an electronic
voting system, post a public notice in the office of the
county clerk and the website of the county clerk and notify
the state chairman and the county chairman of each
political party having a candidate on the ballot, stating
the time and place of the test. The political party
representatives, and representatives of independent
candidates, at the county clerk's discretion not less than
three (3) members of the public, but not more than a number
that will ensure the orderly testing of machines, and
members of the public may be present for the test, which
shall be held at least two (2) weeks before the election.
The test shall ascertain that the all automatic tabulating
equipment to be used in the election will accurately count
the votes cast on all ballot styles that may be used in the
election for all offices and all measures. The test shall
be conducted by processing a preaudited group of paper
ballots or all ballot cards styles on which are recorded a
predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and
on each measure and shall include for each office one (1)
or more ballots which have votes in excess of the number
allowed by law in order to test the ability of the
automatic tabulating equipment to reject such votes. If the
county use an electronic ballot marking device in any way,
the test shall also be conducted using ballots or ballot
cards on each machine that are marked by an electronic
ballot marking device. During the test a different number
of valid votes shall be assigned to each candidate,
including write-in candidates, for an office, and for and
against each measure, including at least one (1) undervote
and one (1) overvote in each race or measure in each ballot
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0028
ENROLLED ACT NO. 66, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
style for each machine type capable of recording an
undervote or overvote. If any error is detected, or if the
test is not completed in compliance with law, the cause of
it shall be ascertained and corrected and an errorless
count shall be secured and certified to by the county
clerk. On completion of the count, the results, reported in
the same manner official election results are reported,
shall be retained by the county clerk, posted to the county
clerk's website and a copy of the results, reported in the
same manner official election results are reported, shall
be provided to any person upon request. The programs, test
materials and ballots shall be sealed and retained as
provided for paper ballots, provided that if a re-test is
required the seals may be broken so that an errorless count
can be secured and certified as provided in this paragraph;
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0028
ENROLLED ACT NO. 66, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6